Hawaii statutes.
§457-16 Severability. If any provision
of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications
of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable. [L
1970, c 71, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next